District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Seasonal Pricing and Price Gouging Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 41 of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“28-4102.01. Stockpiling.”.
(b) Section 28-4101 is amended to read as follows:
“§ 28-4101. Definitions.
“For the purposes of this chapter, the term:
“(1) “Goods and services” shall include:
“(A) Consumer goods and services used, bought, or rendered primarily for
personal, family, or household purposes;
“(B) Essential medical supplies and services used for the care, cure,
mitigation, treatment, or prevention of any illnesses or diseases; and
“(C) Any other essential goods and services used to promote the health or
welfare of the public.
“(2) “Natural disaster” means the actual or imminent consequence of any disaster,
catastrophe, or emergency, including fire (other than a fire caused by human error or arson),
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
flood, earthquake, storm, or other serious act of nature, which threatens the health, safety, or
welfare of persons or causes widespread damage to property in the District of Columbia.
“(3)(A) “Normal retail price” means not more than 10% more than the price at
which the same or similar goods and services were sold in the District of Columbia during the
90-day period that immediately preceded a natural disaster, if an emergency is declared pursuant
to § 28-4102(b), or the circumstances giving rise to a public emergency, if a public emergency is
declared pursuant to § 7-2304.
“(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, for calendar
year 2027 and thereafter, “normal retail price” means:
“(i) For a rental vehicle, not more than 10% more than the price at
which a person charged for the same or a similar rental vehicle during the same week of the same
months of the prior year. For purposes of this sub-subparagraph, the term “rental vehicle” shall
have the same meaning as set forth in § 50-1505.01(8); and
“(ii) For a hotel room in a hotel that is at least 95% occupied, not
more than 10% more than the price at which a person charged for the same or a similar room
during the same week of the same month of the most recent year for which there was an average
hotel room occupancy of 95%. For purposes of this sub-subparagraph, the term “hotel room”
means any room or suite of rooms at a facility affording sleeping accommodations to transient
guests.
“(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph, if a
person did not sell goods and services in the District of Columbia during the 90-day period that
preceded a natural disaster, if an emergency is declared pursuant to § 28-4102(b), or the
circumstances giving rise to a public emergency, if a public emergency is declared pursuant to §
7-2304, that person may not charge a price that is more than 50 percent greater than the actual
price the person paid to the manufacturer or distributor for the good or service.
“(4) “Person” means a corporation, firm, agency, company, association,
organization, partnership, society, joint stock company, or an individual.
“(5) “Public emergency” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 7-
2301(3).”.
(c) Section 28-4102 is amended to read as follows:
“§ 28-4102. Overcharging.
“(a) Except as provided in subsection (a-1) of this section, it shall be unlawful for any
person to charge more than that person’s normal retail price for any goods or services sold during
an emergency resulting from a natural disaster declared pursuant to subsection (b) of this section,
or during a public emergency declared pursuant to § 7-2304.
“(a-1) A person may charge more than the normal retail price for any goods or services
sold during an emergency resulting from a natural disaster declared pursuant to subsection (b) of
this section, or during a public emergency declared pursuant to § 7-2304, if:
“(1) The price increase is directly attributable to additional costs imposed on the
person by the supplier of goods; or
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(2) The price increase is directly attributable to additional costs for labor or
materials used to provide the service or produce the goods.
“(b)(1) Within 48 hours of a natural disaster, the Mayor may declare, for not more than
30 calendar days, a state of emergency for the purposes of this chapter. The Mayor shall prepare
an emergency declaration that shall include a description of the existence, nature, extent, and
duration of the emergency.
“(2) Upon the issuance of a declaration of an emergency or as soon as practicable
given the nature of the emergency, the Mayor shall publish a copy of the emergency declaration
in the District of Columbia Register and in 2 daily newspapers of general circulation.”.
(d) A new section 28-4102.01 is added to read as follows:
“§ 28-4102.01. Stockpiling.
“It shall be unlawful for any person to purchase goods in quantities greater than those
specified by the Mayor or the federal government during a public emergency declared pursuant
to § 7-2304, or during an emergency resulting from a natural disaster declared pursuant to § 28-
4102(b), if the Mayor or the federal government have declared said goods to be:
“(1) Necessary for first responders or others during a natural disaster or public
emergency;
“(2) Necessary to maintain supply chains of commerce during a natural disaster or
a public emergency; or
“(3) Subject to government-ordered rationing.”.
(e) Section 28-4103 is amended to read as follows:
“§ 28-4103. Penalties.
“(a)(1) A violation of § 28-4102(a) or § 28-4102.01 shall be a civil infraction for
purposes of Chapter 18 of Title 2.
“(2) For each violation of § 28-4102(a) or § 28-4102.01, civil fines, penalties, and
fees in an amount not more than $1,000 may be imposed by the Mayor, pursuant to Chapter 18
of Title 2.
“(3) Adjudication of any infraction under this subsection shall be pursuant to
Chapter 18 of Title 2.
“(b) In addition to any monetary penalty imposed under subsection (a) this section:
“(1) The Mayor may revoke, suspend, or limit the license, permit, or certificate of
occupancy of a person who violates § 28-4102(a) or § 28-4102.01; and
“(2)(A) The Attorney General for the District of Columbia may bring an action in
the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to enjoin violations of § 28-4102(a) or § 28-
4102.01 and to require the violator to take affirmative action, including the restitution of money
or property. In any action under this section, the Attorney General shall not be required to prove
damages and the injunction shall be issued without bond.
“(B) In action brought pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the
Attorney General for the District of Columbia may recover:
“(i) A civil penalty of $1,000 to $10,000 for each violation;
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(ii) Economic damages; and
“(iii) The costs of the action and reasonable attorneys’ fees.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
4